Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.310

Abandonment—Special election necessary.

The proposition to abandon the council-manager plan must be voted on at a special election called for that purpose at which the only proposition to be voted on shall be: "Shall the city (or town) of . . . . . . abandon its organization under the council-manager plan and become a city (or town) under the general law governing cities (or towns) of . . . . . . class?"

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.18.310. Prior: 1943 c 271 s 22 part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-31, part.]